Hawaii statutes.
§125-2 Powers in an emergency. If the
governor declares that an emergency as defined in section 125-1 exists, the
governor or the governor's authorized representatives, to make available
commodities necessary to the public health, safety, or welfare, or to insure
the availability of commodities required to maintain commerce to or within the
State under normal conditions, may:

(1) Whenever the availability of shipping space
depends upon determination by the governor or the governor's authorized
representatives, of the emergency needs of the population, allocate space to
and among types of commodities and consignees, such distribution of space among
consignees to be upon an equitable basis so far as reasonably practicable.

(2) Charter or affreight a ship or ships, make any
other arrangements, including contracts of guaranty, for the procurement of
ships and any other means of transportation, and transport cargoes to the
State. Cargoes from the State may be transported on any return voyage.

(3) Purchase and resell, or otherwise distribute
commodities.

(4) Control the distribution of commodities by rules
and regulations promulgated pursuant to chapter 91. [L Sp 1949, c 21, §2; RL
1955, §357-2; HRS §125-2; am L 1973, c 195, §2; am L 1974, c 5, §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next